California statutes. Vehicle Code
All law enforcement agencies shall, not later than January 1, 1991, establish a policy and issue an order, in writing, which states whether or not their officers are required to wear seat belts. When a law enforcement agency is developing a safety belt policy, the agency shall consider the officer’s safety, comfort, and convenience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 33, Sec. 3.   Effective March 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

27316.

(a) Unless specifically prohibited by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, all schoolbuses purchased or leased for use in California shall be equipped at all designated seating positions with a combination pelvic and upper torso passenger restraint system, if the schoolbus is either of the following:

(1) Type 1, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and is manufactured on or after July 1, 2005.

(2) Type 2, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and is manufactured on or after July 1, 2004.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “passenger restraint system” means any of the following:

(1) A restraint system that is in compliance with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 209, for a type 2 seatbelt assembly, and with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 210, as those standards were in effect on the date the schoolbus was manufactured.

(2) A restraint system certified by the schoolbus manufacturer that is in compliance with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 222 and incorporates a type 2 lap/shoulder restraint system.

(c) A person, school district, or
 organization, with respect to a schoolbus equipped with passenger restraint systems pursuant to this section, shall not be charged for a violation of this code or any regulation adopted thereunder requiring a passenger to use a passenger restraint system, if a passenger on the schoolbus fails to use or improperly uses the passenger restraint system.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, in implementing this section, that school pupil transportation providers work to prioritize the allocation of schoolbuses purchased, leased, or contracted for on or after July 1, 2004, for type 2 schoolbuses, or on or after July 1, 2005, for type 1 schoolbuses, to ensure that elementary level schoolbus passengers receive first priority for new schoolbuses whenever
 feasible.

(e) On or before July 1, 2035, all schoolbuses in use in California shall be equipped with a passenger restraint system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

27316.5.

(a) Unless specifically prohibited by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, all type 2 school pupil activity buses, manufactured on or after July 1, 2004, purchased or leased for use in California shall be equipped at all designated seating positions with a combination pelvic and upper torso passenger restraint system.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “passenger restraint system” is either of the following:

(1) A restraint system that is in compliance with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 209, for a type 2 seatbelt assembly, and with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
 Standard 210, as those standards were in effect on the date that the school pupil activity bus was manufactured.

(2) A restraint system certified by the school pupil activity bus manufacturer that is in compliance with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 222 and incorporates a type 2 lap-shoulder restraint system.

(c) No person, school district, or organization, with respect to a type 2 school pupil activity bus equipped with passenger restraint systems pursuant to this section, may be charged for a violation of this code or any regulation adopted thereunder requiring a passenger to use a passenger restraint system, if a passenger on the school pupil activity bus fails to use or improperly uses the passenger restraint system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 397, Sec. 8.   (SB 810)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

27317.

(a) A person shall not knowingly and intentionally manufacture, import, install, reinstall, distribute, sell, or offer for sale any device intended to replace a supplemental restraint system component in any motor vehicle if the device is a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component or a nonfunctional airbag, or does not meet federal safety requirements as provided in Section 571.208 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) A person shall not knowingly and intentionally sell, install, or reinstall in a vehicle, any device that causes the vehicle’s diagnostic systems to fail to warn when the vehicle is equipped with a counterfeit supplemental restraint
 system component or nonfunctional airbag, or when no airbag is installed.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(d) An installation or reinstallation shall not have occurred for purposes of this section until the work is complete.

(e) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Airbag” means a motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system device that is part of a supplemental restraint system.

(2) “Counterfeit supplemental restraint system component” means a replacement supplemental restraint system component, including, but not limited to, an airbag that displays a mark identical or substantially similar to the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer or a supplier of parts to the manufacturer of a motor vehicle without authorization from that manufacturer or supplier, respectively.

(3) “Nonfunctional airbag” means a replacement airbag that meets any of the following criteria:

(A) The airbag was previously deployed or damaged.

(B) The airbag has an electric fault that is detected by the vehicle’s airbag diagnostic systems when the installation procedure is completed and the vehicle is returned
 to the customer who requested the work to be performed or when ownership is intended to be transferred.

(C) The airbag includes a part or object, including, but not limited to, a supplemental restraint system component installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional airbag has been installed.

(D) The airbag is subject to the prohibitions of subsection (j) of Section 30120 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(4) “Supplemental restraint system,” commonly referred to as an “SRS,” means a passive inflatable motor vehicle occupant crash protection system designed for use in conjunction with active restraint systems, as defined in Section 571.208 of Title 49
 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A supplemental restraint system includes one or more airbags and all components required to ensure that an airbag works as designed by the vehicle manufacturer, including both of the following:

(A) The airbag operates in the event of a crash.

(B) The airbag is designed in accordance with federal motor vehicle safety standards for the specific make, model, and year of the motor vehicle in which it is or will be installed.

(f) This section does not affect any duties, rights, or remedies otherwise available at law.

(g) This section does not preclude
 prosecution under any other law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   (AB 2387)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

27318.

(a) A passenger who is 16 years of age or older in a bus shall be properly restrained by a safety belt.

(b) A parent, legal guardian, or chartering party shall not transport on a bus, or permit to be transported on a bus, a child, ward, or passenger who is eight years of age or older, but under 16 years of age, unless they are properly restrained by a safety belt.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party shall not transport on a bus, or permit to be transported on a bus, a child, ward, or passenger who is under eight years of age and under four feet nine inches in height, unless
 they are acceptably restrained by a safety belt.

(d) If it is not possible to ensure a child, ward, or passenger who is under eight years of age and under four feet nine inches in height is acceptably restrained by a safety belt because of their size, a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party shall either secure them in an appropriate child passenger restraint system that meets applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, or if the child, ward, or passenger is under two years of age, may authorize a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party to hold them.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “acceptably restrained by a safety belt” means all of the following:

(A) The latch plate is
 securely fastened in the buckle.

(B) The lap belt shall be adjusted to fit low and tight across the hips or upper thighs, not the stomach area.

(C) The shoulder belt shall be adjusted snugly across the chest and the middle of the shoulder, away from the neck.

(D) The shoulder belt shall not be placed behind the back or under the arm.

(2) For purposes of this section, “properly restrained by a safety belt” means that the lap belt crosses the hips or upper thighs of the occupant and the shoulder belt, if present, crosses the chest in front of the occupant.

(3) For purposes of this section, “bus” means a bus
 that is equipped with safety belts, including a bus that is required to be equipped with a seatbelt assembly pursuant to Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 208 (49 C.F.R. 571.208).

(f) Subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) do not apply to a passenger that is leaving, has left, or is returning from their seat to use an onboard bathroom.

(g) If the bus is equipped with safety belts, the motor carrier shall maintain safety belts in good working order for the use of passengers of the vehicle.

(h) A motor carrier operating a bus equipped with safety belts shall do one of the following:

(1) Require the bus driver, before departure of a bus carrying passengers,
 to inform passengers of the requirement to wear the seatbelt under California law and inform passengers that not wearing a seatbelt is punishable by a fine.

(2) Post, or allow to be posted, signs or placards that inform passengers of the requirement to wear a seatbelt under California law and that not wearing a seatbelt is punishable by a fine. The signs or placards shall be in a font type and font size that is reasonably easy to read and shall be affixed to a bus in multiple, conspicuous locations.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 42001, a violation of subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than twenty dollars ($20) for a first offense, and a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.

(j) This section does not apply to a schoolbus described in Section 27316 or a school pupil activity bus described in Section 27316.5.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

27318.

(a) A passenger who is 16 years of age or older in a bus shall be properly restrained by a safety belt.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party shall not transport on a bus, or permit to be transported on a bus, a child, ward, or passenger who is under 16 years of age unless they are properly restrained by a safety belt.

(c) If it is not possible to ensure a child, ward, or passenger who is under eight years of age and under four feet nine inches in height is properly restrained by a safety belt because of their size, a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party shall either secure them in an appropriate child passenger restraint
 system that meets applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, or if the child, ward, or passenger is under two years of age, may authorize a parent, legal guardian, or chartering party to hold them.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, the following terms and phrases have the following meanings:

(2) “Bus” means a bus that is equipped with safety belts, including a bus that is required to be equipped with a seatbelt assembly pursuant to Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 208 (49 C.F.R. 571.208).

(3) “Properly restrained by a safety belt” means the child, ward, or passenger meets all of the following requirements of the 5-Step test:

(A) The child, ward, or passenger is sitting all the way back against the auto
 seat.

(B) The knees of the child, ward, or passenger bend over the edge of the auto seat.

(C) The shoulder belt snugly crosses the center of the child, ward, or passenger’s chest and shoulder, not the child, ward, or passenger’s neck.

(D) The lap belt is as low as possible and is touching the child, ward, or passenger’s thighs.

(E) The child, ward, or passenger can stay seated like this for the whole trip.

(e) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) do not apply to a passenger that is leaving, has left, or is returning from their seat to use an onboard bathroom.

(f) If the bus is equipped with safety belts, the motor carrier shall
 maintain safety belts in good working order for the use of passengers of the vehicle.

(g) A motor carrier operating a bus equipped with safety belts shall do one of the following:

(1) Require the bus driver, before departure of a bus carrying passengers, to inform passengers of the requirement to wear the seatbelt under California law and inform passengers that not wearing a seatbelt is punishable by a fine.

(2) Post, or allow to be posted, signs or placards that inform passengers of the requirement to wear a seatbelt under California law and that not wearing a seatbelt is punishable by a fine. The signs or placards shall be in a font type and font size that is reasonably easy to read and shall be affixed to a bus in multiple, conspicuous locations.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 42001, a violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than twenty dollars ($20) for a first offense, and a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.

(i) This section does not apply to a schoolbus described in Section 27316 or a school pupil activity bus described in Section 27316.5.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27319.

(a) If a bus is equipped with a driver safety belt, the driver of the bus shall not operate the vehicle unless he or she is properly restrained by the safety belt.

(b) If a bus is equipped with a driver safety belt, the motor carrier shall maintain the safety belt in good working order for the use of the driver.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 42001, a violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than twenty dollars ($20) for a first offense and a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.

(d) The requirements of this section are intended to satisfy the requirements of Section 392.16 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any similar federal law or regulation, but shall remain in effect in the absence of those laws.

(e) This section shall be operative July 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 593, Sec. 3.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Child Safety Belt and Passenger Restraint Requirements [27360. - 27368.]

27360.

(a) Except as provided in Section 27363, a parent, legal guardian, or driver who transports a child under eight years of age on a highway in a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 27315, shall properly secure that child in a rear seat in an appropriate child passenger restraint system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.

(b) Except as provided in Section 27363, a parent, legal guardian, or driver who transports a child under two years of age on a highway in a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 27315, shall properly secure the child in a rear-facing child passenger restraint system that meets applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, unless the
 child weighs 40 or more pounds or is 40 or more inches tall. The child shall be secured in a manner that complies with the height and weight limits specified by the manufacturer of the child passenger restraint system.

(c) This section does not apply to a driver if the parent or legal guardian of the child is a passenger in the motor vehicle.

(d) This section shall become operative January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 292, Sec. 2.   (AB 53)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27360.5.

(a) A parent, legal guardian, or driver shall not transport on a highway in a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 27315, a child or ward who is eight years of age or older, but less than 16 years of age, without properly securing that child or ward in an appropriate child passenger restraint system or safety belt meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a driver if the parent or legal guardian of the child is also present in the motor vehicle and is not the driver.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and
 as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 5.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

27360.5.

(a) A parent, legal guardian, or driver shall not transport on a highway in a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 27315, a child or ward who is eight years of age or older, but less than 16 years of age, without properly securing that child or ward in an appropriate child passenger restraint system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards or unless the child or ward is properly restrained by a safety belt.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a driver if the parent or legal guardian of the child is also present in the motor vehicle and is not the driver.

(c) For purposes of this section, “properly restrained by a safety
 belt” means the child or ward meets all of the following requirements of the 5-Step test:

(1) The child or ward is sitting all the way back against the auto seat.

(2) The knees of the child or ward bend over the edge of the auto seat.

(3) The shoulder belt snugly crosses the center of the child’s chest and shoulder, not the child’s neck.

(4) The lap belt is as low as possible and is touching the child or ward’s thighs.

(5) The child or ward can stay seated like this for the whole trip.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27360.6.

(a) (1) For a conviction under Section 27360 or 27360.5, a first offense is punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), except that the court may reduce or waive the fine if the defendant establishes to the satisfaction of the court that he or she is economically disadvantaged, and the court, instead, refers the defendant to a community education program that includes, but is not limited to, education on the proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system for children of all ages, and provides certification to the court of completion of that program. Upon completion of the program, the defendant shall provide proof of participation in the program. If an education program on the proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint
 system is not available within 50 miles of the residence of the defendant, the requirement to participate in that program shall be waived. If the fine is paid, waived, or reduced, the court shall report the conviction to the department pursuant to Section 1803.

(2) The court may require a defendant described under paragraph (1) to attend an education program that includes demonstration of proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system and provides certification to the court that the defendant has presented for inspection a child passenger restraint system that meets applicable federal safety standards.

(b) (1) A second or subsequent conviction under Section 27360 or 27360.5 is punishable by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), no part of which may be waived by the court, except that the court may reduce or waive the fine if the
 defendant establishes to the satisfaction of the court that he or she is economically disadvantaged, and the court, instead refers the defendant to a community education program that includes, but is not limited to, education on the proper installation and use of child passenger restraint systems for children of all ages, and provides certification to the court of completion of that program. Upon completion of the program, the defendant shall provide proof of participation in the program. If an education program on the proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system is not available within 50 miles of the residence of the defendant, the requirement to participate in that program shall be waived. If the fine is paid, waived, or reduced, the court shall report the conviction to the department pursuant to Section 1803.

(2) The court may require a defendant described under paragraph (1) to attend an education program that includes
 demonstration of proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system and provides certification to the court that the defendant has presented for inspection a child passenger restraint system that meets applicable federal safety standards.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the fines collected under this section shall be allocated as follows:

(1) (A) Sixty percent to health departments of local jurisdictions where the violation occurred, to be used for a community education and assistance program that includes, but is not limited to, demonstration of the proper installation and use of child passenger restraint systems for children of all ages and assistance to economically disadvantaged families in obtaining a restraint system through a low-cost purchase or loan. The county or city health department shall designate a coordinator to facilitate
 the creation of a special account and to develop a relationship with the court system to facilitate the transfer of funds to the program. The county or city may contract for the implementation of the program. Prior to obtaining possession of a child passenger restraint system pursuant to this subdivision, a person shall attend an education program that includes demonstration of proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system.

(B) As the proceeds from fines become available, county or city health departments shall prepare and maintain a listing of all child passenger restraint low-cost purchase or loaner programs in their counties, including a semiannual verification that all programs listed are in existence. Each county or city shall forward the listing to the Office of Traffic Safety in the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency and the courts, birthing centers, community child health and disability prevention programs,
 county clinics, prenatal clinics, women, infants, and children programs, and county hospitals in that county, who shall make the listing available to the public. The Office of Traffic Safety shall maintain a listing of all of the programs in the state.

(2) Twenty-five percent to the county or city for the administration of the community education program.

(3) Fifteen percent to the city, to be deposited in its general fund except that, if the violation occurred in an unincorporated area, this amount shall be allocated to the county for purposes of paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 474, Sec. 7.   (SB 929)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27361.

A law enforcement officer reasonably suspecting a violation of Section 27360 or 27360.5, or both of those sections, may stop a vehicle transporting a child appearing to the officer to be within the age specified in Section 27360 or 27360.5. The officer may issue a notice to appear for a violation of Section 27360 or 27360.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 474, Sec. 8.   (SB 929)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27362.

(a) A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer shall not sell, offer for sale, or install in a motor vehicle, a child passenger restraint system that does not conform to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards on the date of manufacture. Responsibility for compliance with this section shall rest with the individual selling the system, offering the system for sale, or installing the system. A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400), or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than 90 days, or both.

(2) Upon a second or subsequent conviction, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than 180 days, or both.

(b) The fines collected for a violation of this section shall be allocated as follows:

(1) (A) Sixty percent to the county or city health department where the violation occurred, to be used for a child passenger restraint low-cost purchase or loaner program which shall include, but not be limited to, education on the proper installation and use of a child passenger restraint system. The county
 health department shall designate a coordinator to facilitate the creation of a special account and to develop a relationship with the superior court to facilitate the transfer of funds to the program. The county may contract for the implementation of the program. Prior to obtaining possession of a child passenger restraint system pursuant to this section, a person shall receive information relating to the importance of utilizing that system.

(B) As the proceeds from fines become available, county health departments shall prepare and maintain a listing of all child passenger restraint low-cost purchase or loaner programs in their counties, including a semiannual verification that all programs listed are in existence. Each county shall forward the listing to the Office of Traffic Safety in the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency and the courts, birthing centers, community child health and disability prevention programs, and county
 hospitals in that county, who shall make the listing available to the public. The Office of Traffic Safety shall maintain a listing of all of the programs in the state.

(2) Twenty-five percent to the county for the administration of the program.

(3) Fifteen percent to the city, to be deposited in its general fund except that, if the violation occurred in an unincorporated area, this amount shall be allocated to the county for purposes of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

27362.1.

(a) No individual may sell or offer for sale a child passenger restraint system that was in use by a child during an accident involving a motor vehicle.

(b) A violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 703, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27363.

(a) The court may exempt from the requirements of this article any class of child by age, weight, or size if it is determined that the use of a child passenger restraint system would be impractical by reason of physical unfitness, medical condition, or size. The court may require satisfactory proof of the child’s physical unfitness, medical condition, or size and that an appropriate special needs child passenger restraint system is not available.

(b) In case of a life-threatening emergency, or when a child is being transported in an authorized emergency vehicle, if there is no child passenger restraint system available, a child may be transported without the use of that system, but the
 child shall be secured by a seatbelt.

(c) A child weighing more than 40 pounds may be transported in the backseat of a vehicle while wearing only a lap safety belt when the backseat of the vehicle is not equipped with a combination lap and shoulder safety belt.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 27360, a child or ward under eight years of age who is four feet nine inches in height or taller may be properly restrained by a safety belt, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 27315, rather than by a child passenger restraint system.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 27360, a child or ward under eight years of age may ride properly secured in an appropriate child passenger restraint system meeting applicable
 federal motor vehicle safety standards in the front seat of a motor vehicle under any of the following circumstances:

(1) There is no rear seat.

(2) The rear seats are side-facing jump seats.

(3) The rear seats are rear-facing seats.

(4) The child passenger restraint system cannot be installed properly in the rear seat.

(5) All rear seats are already occupied by children seven years of age or under.

(6) Medical reasons necessitate that the child or ward not ride in the rear seat. The court may require satisfactory proof of the child’s
 medical condition.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a child shall not be transported in a rear-facing child passenger restraint system in the front seat of a motor vehicle that is equipped with an active frontal passenger airbag.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 7.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

27363.

(a) The court may exempt from the requirements of this article any class of child by age, weight, or size if it is determined that the use of a child passenger restraint system would be impractical by reason of physical unfitness, medical condition, or size. The court may require satisfactory proof of the child’s physical unfitness, medical condition, or size and that an appropriate special needs child passenger restraint system is not available.

(b) In case of a life-threatening emergency, or when a child is being transported in an authorized emergency vehicle, if there is no child passenger restraint system available, a child may be transported without the use of that system, but the child shall be secured by a seatbelt.

(c) A child weighing more than 40 pounds may be transported in the backseat of a vehicle while wearing only a lap safety belt when the backseat of the vehicle is not equipped with a combination lap and shoulder safety belt.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 27360, a child or ward under eight years of age who is four feet nine inches in height or taller may be properly restrained by a safety belt rather than by a child passenger restraint system.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 27360, a child or ward under eight years of age may ride properly secured in an appropriate child passenger restraint system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards in the front seat of a motor vehicle under any of the following circumstances:

(1) There is no rear seat.

(2) The rear seats are side-facing jump seats.

(3) The rear seats are rear-facing seats.

(4) The child passenger restraint system cannot be installed properly in the rear seat.

(5) All rear seats are already occupied by children seven years of age or under.

(6) Medical reasons necessitate that the child or ward not ride in the rear seat. The court may require satisfactory proof of the child’s medical condition.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a child shall not be transported in a rear-facing child passenger restraint system in the front seat of a motor vehicle that is equipped with an active frontal passenger airbag.

(g) For purposes of this section, “properly restrained by a safety belt” means the child or ward meets all of the following requirements of the 5-Step test:

(1) The child or ward is sitting all the way back against the auto seat.

(2) The knees of the child or ward bend over the edge of the auto seat.

(3) The shoulder belt snugly crosses the center of the child’s chest and shoulder, not the child’s neck.

(4) The lap belt is as low as possible and is touching the child or ward’s thighs.

(5) The child or ward can stay seated like this for the whole trip.

(h) This
 section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27363.5.

(a) A public or private hospital, clinic, or birthing center shall, at the time of the discharge of a child, provide to and discuss with the parents or the person to whom the child is released, if the child is under eight years of age, information on the current law requiring child passenger restraint systems, safety belts, and the transportation of children in rear seats.

(b) A public or private hospital, clinic, or birthing center shall also provide to and discuss with the parent or person to whom the child is released, if the child is under eight years of age, contact information to direct the person to an Internet Web site or other contact that could provide, at no cost or low
 cost, information and assistance relating to child passenger restraint system requirements, installation, and inspection. Pursuant to this subdivision, the hospital, clinic, or birthing center does not have any additional obligation to provide patients with any assistance relating to child passenger restraint systems, other than providing the contact information as set forth in this subdivision. This contact information may include the following:

(1) Call 1-866-SEAT-CHECK or visit www.seatcheck.org to find a nearby location.

(2) The telephone number of the local office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(3) The Internet Web site for the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s Child Safety Seat Inspection Station Locator.

(4) The Internet Web site for the State Department of Public Health’s child passenger restraint system safety inspection locator.

(c) A public or private hospital, clinic, or birthing center shall not be responsible for the failure of the parent or person to whom the child is released to properly transport the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

27364.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to insure that children, who are, because of their tender years, helpless dependent passengers, are provided with the safest transportation possible.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature to stress and communicate to all drivers in this state the importance of using child passenger restraint systems.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be
 construed to extend application of these provisions to a class of children other than the class of children herein specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 512, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27365.

(a) (1) A car rental agency in California shall inform each of its customers of Section 27360 by posting, in a place conspicuous to the public in each established place of business of the agency, a notice not smaller than 15 by 20 inches which states the following:

“CALIFORNIA LAW REQUIRES ALL CHILDREN UNDER 8 YEARS OF AGE TO BE TRANSPORTED IN THE REAR SEAT OF THE VEHICLE IN A CHILD RESTRAINT SYSTEM. THIS AGENCY IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE FOR RENTAL OF A CHILD RESTRAINT SYSTEM IF YOU DO NOT HAVE A CHILD RESTRAINT SYSTEM YOURSELF.”

(2) The posted notice specified in paragraph (1) is not required if the car rental agency’s
 place of business is located in a hotel that has a business policy prohibiting the posting of signs or notices in any area of the hotel. In that case, a car rental agency shall furnish a written notice to each customer that contains the same information as required for the posted notice.

(b) Every car rental agency in California shall have available for, and shall, upon request, provide for rental to, adults traveling with children under eight years of age, child passenger restraint systems that are certified by the manufacturer to meet applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards for use by children, are in good and safe condition, with no missing original parts, and are not older than five years.

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 474, Sec. 11.   (SB 929)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27366.

(a) The department shall do the following:

(1) Prepare and disseminate materials for the purpose of educating the public about the importance of using passenger restraints for infants and children under 15 years of age. These materials shall include, but are not limited to, audiovisual aids and written materials that explain the effects of motor vehicle accidents on infants and children and the reduction in risk of injury or death as a result of the utilization of passenger
 restraints for infants and children.

(2) As funding is available, produce and administer a billboard campaign stressing the importance of utilizing child passenger restraint systems and instructing the public on where to obtain those systems.

(b) The department, the Office of Traffic Safety, and the State Department of Health Services shall meet annually to coordinate, share information about, and outline the programs that each organization is pursuing in the area of child passenger restraint systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 512, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27368.
